Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-930
Law enforcement agency; Nebraska Commission
on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice; duties.

(1) By January
1, 1998, each law enforcement agency shall develop a system for recording
incidents of domestic abuse within its jurisdiction. All incidents of domestic
abuse, whether or not an arrest was made, shall be documented with a written
incident report form that includes a domestic abuse identifier.

(2) By January 1, 1998, the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and
Criminal Justice shall develop or shall approve a monthly reporting process.
Each law enforcement agency shall compile and submit a monthly report to the
commission on the number of domestic abuse incidents recorded within its jurisdiction.

(3) The commission shall submit
a report annually to the Governor, the Legislature, and the public indicating the total number
of incidents of domestic abuse reported by each reporting agency. The report submitted to the Legislature
shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 1997, LB 829, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 43.